Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-818
Authority; officers, members, and employees; surety bond requirements.

Before the issuance of any bonds under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act, the chairperson, vice-chairperson, executive director, and
assistant executive director, if any, and any other member of the authority
authorized by resolution of the authority to handle funds or sign checks of
the authority shall execute a surety bond in such amount as a majority of
the members of the authority determine, or alternatively, the chairperson
of the authority shall execute a blanket bond effecting such coverage. Each
surety bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties
of the office or offices covered and shall be executed by a surety company
authorized to transact business in this state, and the cost of each such surety
bond shall be paid by the authority.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2915;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1715;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 18.